Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.160

Denial, suspension, revocation of licenses, probationary orders—Procedure.

In all proceedings for revocation, suspension, or denial of a license, or the issuance of a conditional or probationary order, the licensee or applicant shall be given an opportunity to be heard and may be represented by counsel. The director shall give the licensee or applicant twenty days' notice in writing and such notice shall specify the charges or reasons for the hearing for such revocation, suspension, denial or the issuance of a conditional or probationary order. The notice shall also state the date, time and place where such hearing is to be held. A copy of such notice shall be mailed to the licensee's surety. Such hearings shall be held in the city of Olympia, unless a different place is fixed by the director.

[ 1959 c 139 s 16.]